Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,105
Transfer of cosmetology student; requirements.

A student may transfer from one school of cosmetology to another school at any time without penalty if all tuition obligations to the school from which the student is transferring have been honored and if the student secures a letter from the school from which he or she is transferring stating that the student has not left any unfulfilled tuition obligations and stating the number of hours earned by the student at such school, including any hours the student transferred into that school, and the dates of attendance of the student at that school. The student may not begin training at the new school until such conditions have been fulfilled. The school to which the student is transferring shall be entitled to receive from the student's previous school, upon request, all records pertaining to the student.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 103;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,142;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 367;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 32.